Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2487
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that:

(1) There is an opioid epidemic occurring in the United States, and Nebraska has been impacted;

(2) The opioid epidemic in Nebraska is a serious public health crisis stemming from the rapid increase in the use of prescription and nonprescription opioid drugs;

(3) Many states are recovering funds for the management of opioid addiction within their borders;

(4) Coordination surrounding and managing opioid addiction and related disorders is critical to the health and safety of all Nebraskans;

(5) Funding for prevention and treatment of opioid addiction and related disorders, including those that are co-occurring with other mental health and substance use disorders, is needed in Nebraska;

(6) Law enforcement agencies in the State of Nebraska are dealing with the effects of the opioid epidemic daily and are in need of resources for training, education, and interdiction;

(7) There is a need to enhance the network of professionals who provide treatment for opioid addiction and related disorders, including co-occurring mental health disorders and other co-occurring substance use disorders;

(8) There is a need for education of medical professionals, including training on proper prescription practices and best practices for tapering patients off of prescribed opioids for medical use;

(9) Incarcerated individuals in the Nebraska correctional system and other vulnerable populations with opioid use disorder need access to resources that will help address addiction; and

(10) The health and safety of all Nebraskans will be improved by opioid remediation in the State of Nebraska.

Laws 2020, LB1124, § 3;

Laws 2024, LB1355, § 6.